Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2213
Bonds; special obligations of state; payment.

The bonds shall be special obligations of the state payable solely and only from the fund, the State Highway Capital Improvement Fund, or the bond fund, as the case may be, and neither the members of the commission nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable thereon. Such bonds shall not be a general obligation debt of this state and they shall contain on the face thereof a statement to such effect.

Laws 1969, c. 309, § 13, p. 1111;

Laws 1988, LB 632, § 7;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 36.